Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2902
Terms, defined; Revisor of Statutes; duties.

Whenever in the statutes of Nebraska, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) The term incompetent person or words of similar import occur they shall be taken to mean and apply to incapacitated person or incompetent person as used in this code; and

(2) The term guardian shall be taken to mean and include guardian or conservator as used in this code.

The Revisor of Statutes shall make corrections in the statutes necessitated by this section.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 315;

Laws 1986, LB 1177, § 12.